Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 6

Discrimination in Housing and Financing

4-21-601. Discriminatory housing practices generally.

It is a discriminatory practice for any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex, disability, familial status or national origin, to:

Refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, or to refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, real property or a housing accommodation to a person;

Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of real property or a housing accommodation, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection therewith;

Refuse to receive or transmit a bona fide offer to purchase, rent or lease real property or a housing accommodation from a person;

Represent to a person that real property or a housing accommodation is not available for inspection, sale, rental or lease when in fact it is so available, or to refuse to permit a person to inspect real property or a housing accommodation;

Make, print, publish, circulate, post or mail or cause to be made, printed, published, circulated, posted or mailed a notice, statement, advertisement or sign, or use a form of application for the purchase, rental or lease of real property or a housing accommodation, or make a record of inquiry in connection with the prospective purchase, rental or lease of real property or a housing accommodation, that indicates, directly or indirectly, a limitation, specification or discrimination as to race, color, creed, religion, sex, disability, familial status or national origin or an intent to make such a limitation, specification or discrimination;

Offer, solicit, accept, use or retain a listing of real property or a housing accommodation for sale, rental or lease with the understanding that a person may be discriminated against in the sale, rental or lease of that real property or housing accommodation or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith; or

Deny any person access to, or membership or participation in, any multiple-listing services, real estate brokers' organization or other service, organization or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings, or to discriminate against such person in the terms or conditions of such access, membership or participation.

It is a discriminatory practice for any person to:

Discriminate in the sale or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a disability of:

The buyer or renter;

A person residing in or intending to reside in the dwelling after it is so sold, rented or made available; or

Any person associated with the buyer or renter; or

Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with such dwelling, because of a disability of:

The person;

A person residing in or intending to reside in the dwelling after it is so sold, rented or made available; or

Any person associated with the person.

For purposes of this subsection (b), “discriminate” includes:

Refusing to permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the premises; except that, in the case of a rental, no modification need be permitted unless the renter first agrees to restore the interior of the premises to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted, unless previously negotiated with the landlord;

Refusing to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices or services, when such accommodations may be necessary to afford such person equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

In connection with the design and construction of covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, failing to design and construct those dwellings in such a manner that:

The dwellings have at least one (1) building entrance on an accessible route, unless it is impractical to do so because of terrain or unusual site characteristics; or

With respect to dwellings with a building entrance on an accessible route:

The public use and common use portions of such dwellings are readily accessible to and usable by disabled persons;

All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises within such dwellings are sufficiently wide to allow passage by disabled persons in wheelchairs; and

All premises within such dwellings contain the following features of adaptive design:

An accessible route into and through the dwelling;

Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats and other environmental controls in accessible locations;

Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab bars; and

Usable kitchens and bathrooms, such that an individual in a wheelchair can maneuver about the space.

Buildings consisting of four (4) or more units if such buildings have one (1) or more elevators; and

Ground floor units in other buildings consisting of four (4) or more units.

Nothing in this subsection (b) requires that a dwelling be made available to an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would result in substantial physical damage to the property of others.

It is a discriminatory practice for a person in the business of insuring against hazards to refuse to enter into, or discriminate in the terms, conditions, or privileges of, a contract of insurance against hazards to a housing accommodation or real property because of the race, color, creed, religion, sex or national origin of the person owning, or residing in or near the housing accommodations or real property.

It is a discriminatory practice for a person to coerce, intimidate, threaten or interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of such person's having exercised or enjoyed, or on account of such person's having aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected by this chapter.

This section may also be enforced by appropriate civil action.

Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the American National Standard for buildings and facilities providing accessibility and usability for physically disabled people (commonly cited as “ANSI A117.1”) suffices to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (b)(2)(C)(ii).

As used in this subsection (b), “covered multifamily dwellings” means:

Acts 1984, ch. 1007, § 4; T.C.A., §4-21-127; Acts 1990, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3; 1992, ch. 1027, §§ 10, 11; 2008, ch. 706, §§ 1, 2.

Law Reviews.

The Sins of Innocence in Standing Doctrine, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 297 (2015).

Affirmatively Furthering Neighborhood Choice: Vacant Property Strategies and Fair Housing, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1009 (2016).

Attorney General Opinions. Manager's refusal to lease upstairs apartments to families with children violates law, OAG 94-135, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 163 (11/21/94).

Applicability of subsection (d) to persons not involved in real estate transactions, OAG 99-046, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (3/1/99).

Effect of public advertisement on owner's exemption from prohibitions, OAG 99-046, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (3/1/99).

Limitations on political contributions by major lottery contractors, OAG 03-055, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 72 (4/30/03).

Enforcement of municipal ordinance in state court, OAG 03-061, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 77 (5/07/03).

4-21-602. Exemption from housing provisions.

Nothing in § 4-21-601 shall apply to:

The rental of housing accommodations in a building that contains housing accommodations for not more than two (2) families living independently of each other, if the owner or a member of the owner's family resides in one (1) of the housing accommodations;

The rental of one (1) room or one (1) rooming unit in a housing accommodation by an individual if such individual or a member of such individual's family resides therein, or, as regards to sex, rooms or rental units where the tenants would be required to share a common bath;

A religious organization, association, or society, or any nonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised or controlled by or in conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society, that limits the sale, rental or occupancy of dwellings that it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of the same religion, or that gives preference to such persons, unless membership in such religion is restricted on account of race, color, or national origin; or

As regards to sex, the rental of housing accommodations of single-sex dormitory rental properties, including, but not limited to, those dormitories operated by higher educational institutions.

Nothing in this chapter shall require a real estate operator to negotiate with any individual who has not shown evidence of financial ability to consummate the purchase or rental of a housing accommodation.

Nothing in subsection (a) shall prohibit the use of attorneys, escrow agents, abstractors, title companies and other such professional assistance as necessary to perfect or transfer the title.

Nothing in this part limits the applicability of any reasonable local, state or federal restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling. Nor does any provision in this part regarding familial status apply with respect to dwellings provided under any state or federal program specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons, as defined in the state or federal program, or to housing for older persons.

As used in this subsection (d), “housing for older persons” means housing communities consisting of dwellings:

Intended for, and at least ninety percent (90%) occupied by, at least one (1) person fifty-five (55) years of age or older per unit;

Providing significant facilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or social needs of such persons; and

Publishing and adhering to policies and procedures that demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons fifty-five (55) years of age or older;

Intended for and occupied solely by persons sixty-two (62) years of age or older.

Nothing in this part prohibits conduct against a person because such person has been convicted by any court of competent jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance as defined in § 102 of the Controlled Substances Act (21 U.S.C. § 802), or controlled substance or controlled substance analogue, as defined in the Tennessee Drug Control Act, compiled in title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

Acts 1984, ch. 1007, § 5; T.C.A., §4-21-128; Acts 1990, ch. 937, § 4; 1992, ch. 1027, §§ 12-15; 2012, ch. 848, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of public advertisement on owner's exemption from prohibitions, OAG 99-046, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (3/1/99).

4-21-603. Blockbusting.

It is a discriminatory practice for a real estate operator, a real estate broker, a real estate salesperson, a financial institution, an employee of any of these, or any other person, for the purpose of inducing a real estate transaction from which such person may benefit financially to:

Represent that a change has occurred or will or may occur in the composition with respect to race, color, creed, religion, sex, disability, familial status or national origin of the owners or occupants in the block, neighborhood or area in which the real property is located; or

Represent that this change will or may result in the lowering of property values, an increase in criminal or antisocial behavior, or a decline in the quality of schools in the block, neighborhood or area in which the real property is located.

Acts 1984, ch. 1007, § 6; T.C.A., §4-21-129; Acts 1992, ch. 1027, § 16; 2008, ch. 706, § 1.

4-21-604. Restrictive covenants and conditions.

Every provision in an oral agreement or a written instrument relating to real property that purports to forbid or restrict the conveyance, encumbrance, occupancy or lease thereof to individuals of a specified race, color, creed, religion, sex or national origin is void.

Every condition, restriction or prohibition, including a right of entry or possibility of reverter, that directly or indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real property on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex or national origin is void, except a limitation of use on the basis of religion of real property held by a religious institution or organization or by a religious or charitable organization operated, supervised, or controlled by a religious institution or organization, and used for religious or charitable purposes.

It is a discriminatory practice to insert in a written instrument relating to real property a provision that is void under this section or to honor or attempt to honor such a provision in the chain of title.

Acts 1984, ch. 1007, § 7; T.C.A., §4-21-130.

4-21-605. Agency no defense in proceeding.

It shall be no defense to a violation of this chapter by a real estate operator, real estate broker, real estate salesperson, financial institution, or other person subject to this chapter that the violation was requested, sought or otherwise procured by a person not subject to this chapter.

Acts 1984, ch. 1007, § 8; T.C.A., §4-21-131.

4-21-606. Residential real estate-related transactions.

It is an unlawful practice for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminate against any person in making available such transaction, or in the terms and conditions of such transaction, because of race, color, creed, religion, sex, disability, familial status or national origin.

As used in this section, “residential real estate-related transaction” means:

The making or purchasing of loans or providing financial assistance:

For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling;

Where the security is residential real estate; or

The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real estate.

Acts 1984, ch. 1007, § 9; T.C.A., §4-21-132; Acts 1992, ch. 1027, § 17; 2008, ch. 706, § 1.

4-21-607. Violations by real estate brokers or salespersons — Notice to real estate commission.

Where a real estate broker or a real estate salesperson has failed to comply with any order issued by the commission or has been found to have committed a discriminatory housing practice in violation of §4-21-601 or §4-21-603, the commission shall notify in writing the real estate commission of the failure to comply or the violation.

Acts 1984, ch. 1007, § 10; T.C.A., §4-21-133.